Hawaii statutes.
[§440J-3] Confidential information.
(a) Notwithstanding chapter 92F, statements and reports provided to the
department pursuant to section 440J-2, and the data contained therein, shall be
kept confidential; provided that the department may disclose mapping
information and data aggregated to the extent necessary in the director's
discretion to prevent identification of a provider with the specific data
furnished by that provider.

(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, the
department shall be prohibited from:

(1) Using the information furnished or obtained for
any purpose other than the purposes for which it is supplied; and

(2) Making any publication whereby the data furnished
by any person can be identified.

(c) The department shall:

(1) Ensure the security and confidentiality of the
information;

(2) Protect against any anticipated threats or
hazards to the security or integrity of the information; and

(3) Protect against unauthorized access to or use of
the information that could result in personal or competitive harm to
individuals or providers. [L 2012, c 259, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next